Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 863 Y 26
SFX 863 še šaninov
SFX 863 še šaninovog
SFX 863 še šaninovoga
SFX 863 še šaninovom
SFX 863 še šaninovome
SFX 863 še šaninovim
SFX 863 še šaninovi
SFX 863 še šaninovih
SFX 863 še šaninove
SFX 863 še šaninova
SFX 863 še šaninovoj
SFX 863 še šaninovu
SFX 863 še šaninovo
SFX 863 še šankin
SFX 863 še šankinog
SFX 863 še šankinoga
SFX 863 še šankinom
SFX 863 še šankinome
SFX 863 še šankinim
SFX 863 še šankini
SFX 863 še šankinih
SFX 863 še šankine
SFX 863 še šankina
SFX 863 še šankinoj
SFX 863 še šankinu
SFX 863 še šankino

SFX 864 Y 26
SFX 864 na ančev
SFX 864 na ančevog
SFX 864 na ančevoga
SFX 864 na ančevom
SFX 864 na ančevome
SFX 864 na ančevim
SFX 864 na ančevi
SFX 864 na ančevih
SFX 864 na ančeve
SFX 864 na ančeva
SFX 864 na ančevoj
SFX 864 na ančevu
SFX 864 na ančevo
SFX 864 na ankin
SFX 864 na ankinog
SFX 864 na ankinoga
SFX 864 na ankinom
SFX 864 na ankinome
SFX 864 na ankinim
SFX 864 na ankini
SFX 864 na ankinih
SFX 864 na ankine
SFX 864 na ankina
SFX 864 na ankinoj
SFX 864 na ankinu
SFX 864 na ankino

SFX 865 Y 26
SFX 865 p pčaninov
SFX 865 p pčaninovog
SFX 865 p pčaninovoga
SFX 865 p pčaninovom
SFX 865 p pčaninovome
SFX 865 p pčaninovim
SFX 865 p pčaninovi
SFX 865 p pčaninovih
SFX 865 p pčaninove
SFX 865 p pčaninova
SFX 865 p pčaninovoj
SFX 865 p pčaninovu
SFX 865 p pčaninovo
SFX 865 p pčankin
SFX 865 p pčankinog
SFX 865 p pčankinoga
SFX 865 p pčankinom
SFX 865 p pčankinome
SFX 865 p pčankinim
SFX 865 p pčankini
SFX 865 p pčankinih
SFX 865 p pčankine
SFX 865 p pčankina
SFX 865 p pčankinoj
SFX 865 p pčankinu
SFX 865 p pčankino

SFX 866 Y 26
SFX 866 čac čaninov
SFX 866 čac čaninovog
SFX 866 čac čaninovoga
SFX 866 čac čaninovom
SFX 866 čac čaninovome
SFX 866 čac čaninovim
SFX 866 čac čaninovi
SFX 866 čac čaninovih
SFX 866 čac čaninove
SFX 866 čac čaninova
SFX 866 čac čaninovoj
SFX 866 čac čaninovu
SFX 866 čac čaninovo
SFX 866 čac čankin
SFX 866 čac čankinog
SFX 866 čac čankinoga
SFX 866 čac čankinom
SFX 866 čac čankinome
SFX 866 čac čankinim
SFX 866 čac čankini
SFX 866 čac čankinih
SFX 866 čac čankine
SFX 866 čac čankina
SFX 866 čac čankinoj
SFX 866 čac čankinu
SFX 866 čac čankino

SFX 867 Y 26
SFX 867 le ljaninov
SFX 867 le ljaninovog
SFX 867 le ljaninovoga
SFX 867 le ljaninovom
SFX 867 le ljaninovome
SFX 867 le ljaninovim
SFX 867 le ljaninovi
SFX 867 le ljaninovih
SFX 867 le ljaninove
SFX 867 le ljaninova
SFX 867 le ljaninovoj
SFX 867 le ljaninovu
SFX 867 le ljaninovo
SFX 867 le ljankin
SFX 867 le ljankinog
SFX 867 le ljankinoga
SFX 867 le ljankinom
SFX 867 le ljankinome
SFX 867 le ljankinim
SFX 867 le ljankini
SFX 867 le ljankinih
SFX 867 le ljankine
SFX 867 le ljankina
SFX 867 le ljankinoj
SFX 867 le ljankinu
SFX 867 le ljankino

SFX 868 Y 26
SFX 868 do đaninov
SFX 868 do đaninovog
SFX 868 do đaninovoga
SFX 868 do đaninovom
SFX 868 do đaninovome
SFX 868 do đaninovim
SFX 868 do đaninovi
SFX 868 do đaninovih
SFX 868 do đaninove
SFX 868 do đaninova
SFX 868 do đaninovoj
SFX 868 do đaninovu
SFX 868 do đaninovo
SFX 868 do đankin
SFX 868 do đankinog
SFX 868 do đankinoga
SFX 868 do đankinom
SFX 868 do đankinome
SFX 868 do đankinim
SFX 868 do đankini
SFX 868 do đankinih
SFX 868 do đankine
SFX 868 do đankina
SFX 868 do đankinoj
SFX 868 do đankinu
SFX 868 do đankino

SFX 869 Y 26
SFX 869 i ljaninov
SFX 869 i ljaninovog
SFX 869 i ljaninovoga
SFX 869 i ljaninovom
SFX 869 i ljaninovome
SFX 869 i ljaninovim
SFX 869 i ljaninovi
SFX 869 i ljaninovih
SFX 869 i ljaninove
SFX 869 i ljaninova
SFX 869 i ljaninovoj
SFX 869 i ljaninovu
SFX 869 i ljaninovo
SFX 869 i ljankin
SFX 869 i ljankinog
SFX 869 i ljankinoga
SFX 869 i ljankinom
SFX 869 i ljankinome
SFX 869 i ljankinim
SFX 869 i ljankini
SFX 869 i ljankinih
SFX 869 i ljankine
SFX 869 i ljankina
SFX 869 i ljankinoj
SFX 869 i ljankinu
SFX 869 i ljankino

SFX 870 Y 26
SFX 870 đe đaninov
SFX 870 đe đaninovog
SFX 870 đe đaninovoga
SFX 870 đe đaninovom
SFX 870 đe đaninovome
SFX 870 đe đaninovim
SFX 870 đe đaninovi
SFX 870 đe đaninovih
SFX 870 đe đaninove
SFX 870 đe đaninova
SFX 870 đe đaninovoj
SFX 870 đe đaninovu
SFX 870 đe đaninovo
SFX 870 đe đankin
SFX 870 đe đankinog
SFX 870 đe đankinoga
SFX 870 đe đankinom
SFX 870 đe đankinome
SFX 870 đe đankinim
SFX 870 đe đankini
SFX 870 đe đankinih
SFX 870 đe đankine
SFX 870 đe đankina
SFX 870 đe đankinoj
SFX 870 đe đankinu
SFX 870 đe đankino

SFX 871 Y 26
SFX 871 za žaninov
SFX 871 za žaninovog
SFX 871 za žaninovoga
SFX 871 za žaninovom
SFX 871 za žaninovome
SFX 871 za žaninovim
SFX 871 za žaninovi
SFX 871 za žaninovih
SFX 871 za žaninove
SFX 871 za žaninova
SFX 871 za žaninovoj
SFX 871 za žaninovu
SFX 871 za žaninovo
SFX 871 za žankin
SFX 871 za žankinog
SFX 871 za žankinoga
SFX 871 za žankinom
SFX 871 za žankinome
SFX 871 za žankinim
SFX 871 za žankini
SFX 871 za žankinih
SFX 871 za žankine
SFX 871 za žankina
SFX 871 za žankinoj
SFX 871 za žankinu
SFX 871 za žankino

SFX 872 Y 26
SFX 872 zna žnjaninov
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovog
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovoga
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovom
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovome
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovim
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovi
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovih
SFX 872 zna žnjaninove
SFX 872 zna žnjaninova
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovoj
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovu
SFX 872 zna žnjaninovo
SFX 872 zna žnjankin
SFX 872 zna žnjankinog
SFX 872 zna žnjankinoga
SFX 872 zna žnjankinom
SFX 872 zna žnjankinome
SFX 872 zna žnjankinim
SFX 872 zna žnjankini
SFX 872 zna žnjankinih
SFX 872 zna žnjankine
SFX 872 zna žnjankina
SFX 872 zna žnjankinoj
SFX 872 zna žnjankinu
SFX 872 zna žnjankino

SFX 873 Y 26
SFX 873 ž žaninov
SFX 873 ž žaninovog
SFX 873 ž žaninovoga
SFX 873 ž žaninovom
SFX 873 ž žaninovome
SFX 873 ž žaninovim
SFX 873 ž žaninovi
SFX 873 ž žaninovih
SFX 873 ž žaninove
SFX 873 ž žaninova
SFX 873 ž žaninovoj
SFX 873 ž žaninovu
SFX 873 ž žaninovo
SFX 873 ž žankin
SFX 873 ž žankinog
SFX 873 ž žankinoga
SFX 873 ž žankinom
SFX 873 ž žankinome
SFX 873 ž žankinim
SFX 873 ž žankini
SFX 873 ž žankinih
SFX 873 ž žankine
SFX 873 ž žankina
SFX 873 ž žankinoj
SFX 873 ž žankinu
SFX 873 ž žankino

SFX 874 Y 26
SFX 874 o njaninov
SFX 874 o njaninovog
SFX 874 o njaninovoga
SFX 874 o njaninovom
SFX 874 o njaninovome
SFX 874 o njaninovim
SFX 874 o njaninovi
SFX 874 o njaninovih
SFX 874 o njaninove
SFX 874 o njaninova
SFX 874 o njaninovoj
SFX 874 o njaninovu
SFX 874 o njaninovo
SFX 874 o njankin
SFX 874 o njankinog
SFX 874 o njankinoga
SFX 874 o njankinom
SFX 874 o njankinome
SFX 874 o njankinim
SFX 874 o njankini
SFX 874 o njankinih
SFX 874 o njankine
SFX 874 o njankina
SFX 874 o njankinoj
SFX 874 o njankinu
SFX 874 o njankino

SFX 875 Y 26
SFX 875 čko čaninov
SFX 875 čko čaninovog
SFX 875 čko čaninovoga
SFX 875 čko čaninovom
SFX 875 čko čaninovome
SFX 875 čko čaninovim
SFX 875 čko čaninovi
SFX 875 čko čaninovih
SFX 875 čko čaninove
SFX 875 čko čaninova
SFX 875 čko čaninovoj
SFX 875 čko čaninovu
SFX 875 čko čaninovo
SFX 875 čko čankin
SFX 875 čko čankinog
SFX 875 čko čankinoga
SFX 875 čko čankinom
SFX 875 čko čankinome
SFX 875 čko čankinim
SFX 875 čko čankini
SFX 875 čko čankinih
SFX 875 čko čankine
SFX 875 čko čankina
SFX 875 čko čankinoj
SFX 875 čko čankinu
SFX 875 čko čankino

SFX 876 Y 26
SFX 876 ska inov
SFX 876 ska inovog
SFX 876 ska inovoga
SFX 876 ska inovom
SFX 876 ska inovome
SFX 876 ska inovim
SFX 876 ska inovi
SFX 876 ska inovih
SFX 876 ska inove
SFX 876 ska inova
SFX 876 ska inovoj
SFX 876 ska inovu
SFX 876 ska inovo
SFX 876 ska kin
SFX 876 ska kinog
SFX 876 ska kinoga
SFX 876 ska kinom
SFX 876 ska kinome
SFX 876 ska kinim
SFX 876 ska kini
SFX 876 ska kinih
SFX 876 ska kine
SFX 876 ska kina
SFX 876 ska kinoj
SFX 876 ska kinu
SFX 876 ska kino
