Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.dic
Bogiše/863
Bosna/864
Botrop/865
Bočac/866
Brgule/867
Brdo/868
Bregovi/869
Brežđe/870
Breza/871
Brezna/872
Brza/871
Briž/873
Brno/874
Brčko/875
Bugarska/876
Busnovi/869
Venčac/866
Vilovi/869
Vitoše/863
Vlaole/867
Voronjež/873
Vrbovno/874
Vrtop/865
Gaza/871
Gazijantep/865
Gajevi/869
Gatino/874
Giza/871
Gramađe/870
Gračac/866
Grebno/874
Grezna/872
Grčac/866
Dvorovi/869
Delimeđe/870
Dijelovi/869
Domžale/867
Drmno/874
Eskondido/868
Žerađe/870
Žitorađe/870
Zabrđe/870
Zavinograđe/870
Zagrađe/870
Zecovi/869
Zlatokop/865
Izumno/874
Kakmuž/873
Kevi/869
Kladno/874
Kluž/873
Kovizle/867
Kolorado/868
Korovi/869
Košarno/874
Koševi/869
Krekovi/869
Krnule/867
Kumodraž/873
Laole/867
Laredo/868
Livađe/870
Lijež/873
Lozna/872
Lugovi/869
Ljutež/873
Malavi/869
Maldivi/869
Male/867
Manajle/867
Maovi/869
Međuvođe/870
Mendoza/871
Misisipi/869
Nabrđe/870
Nejpjido/868
Njiređhaza/871
Obrež/873
Obrijež/873
Oraše/863
Orlando/868
Otočac/866
Padež/873
Pajež/873
Pale/867
Paljuvi/869
Plejno/874
Pobrđe/870
Pobuđe/870
Podbrdo/868
Podgrađe/870
Pojezna/872
Popovi/869
Portorož/873
Potočac/866
Prebreza/871
Predole/867
Prilep/865
Probištip/865
Pustoše/863
Pučile/867
Rino/874
Rubribreza/871
Rudno/874
Rudo/868
Sakule/867
Svođe/870
Sevojno/874
Semedraž/873
Sikole/867
Sip/865
Sirogojno/874
Skrapež/873
Stanovi/869
Suharno/874
Suhotno/874
Tempi/869
Tolido/868
Trpeza/871
Trupale/867
Tulež/873
Tuluza/871
Tupale/867
Ursule/867
Fortaleza/871
Hokaido/868
Čikule/867
Čorle/867
Čučale/867
Džep/865
Šibovi/869
Štip/865
